Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.390

Limitations on the use of gas—Prohibition.

A county shall not in any way prohibit, penalize, or discourage the use of gas for any form of heating, or for uses related to any appliance or equipment, in any building.

[ 2025 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 2066, approved November 5, 2024).]

NOTES:

Findings—2025 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 2066): See note following RCW 80.28.110.